Louisiana, session 2026, HB206.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:8 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§8. Authority to attend meetings of state boards, commissions, task forces,
authorities, agencies and committees; entities subject to confirmation
A. The members of the legislature shall be eligible and are hereby authorized
to attend any meeting of any state board, commission, task force, authority, agency,
or committee and such attendance shall be permitted at both public meetings and
those held in private or executive session.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of
Subsection A of this Section shall apply to any entity if any or all of its membership
is subject to legislative confirmation.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-877 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 206